Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.240

Legislative—Referendum—Filing suspends ordinance.

Upon the filing of a referendum petition praying therefor, the commission shall reconsider an ordinance subject to referendum and upon reconsideration shall defeat it in its entirety or shall submit it to a vote of the people. The operation of an ordinance so protested against shall be suspended until the referendum petition is finally found insufficient or until the ordinance protested against has received a majority of the votes cast thereon at the election.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.240. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 22, part; RRS s 9111, part.]